Florida, session 2026, SB216.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âPromoting Work, 19 Deterring Fraud Act of 2026.â 20 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 443.101, Florida 21 Statutes, is amended to read: 22 443.101âDisqualification for benefits.âAn individual shall 23 be disqualified for benefits: 24 (2)âIf the Department of Commerce finds that the individual 25 has failed without good cause to apply for available suitable 26 work, including contacting the required number of prospective 27 employers per week for any week of unemployment claimed in the 28 benefit year in accordance with s. 443.091, to appear on three 29 or more occasions for a scheduled job interview without 30 notifying the prospective employer of the need to cancel or 31 reschedule the interview, to accept suitable work when offered 32 to him or her, to or return to the individualâs customary self 33 employment when directed by the department, or to return to 34 employment when recalled to work by the individualâs employer 35 after a temporary layoff, the disqualification continues for the 36 next full period of unemployment next ensuing after he or she 37 failed without good cause to apply for available suitable work, 38 accept suitable work, or return to his or her customary 39 employment or self-employment, and until the individual has 40 earned income of at least 17 times his or her weekly benefit 41 amount. The department shall by rule adopt criteria to implement 42 this subsection, including for determining the âsuitability of 43 work,â or âsuitable work,â as used in this section. In 44 developing these rules, the department shall consider the 45 duration of a claimantâs unemployment in determining the 46 suitability of work and the suitability of proposed rates of 47 compensation for available work. Further, after an individual 48 has received 25 weeks of benefits in a single year, suitable 49 work is a job that pays the minimum wage and is 120 percent or 50 more of the weekly benefit amount the individual is drawing. 51 (a)âIn determining whether or not any work is suitable for 52 an individual, the department shall consider the degree of risk 53 to the individualâs health, safety, and morals; the individualâs 54 physical fitness, prior training, experience, prior earnings, 55 length of unemployment, and prospects for securing local work in 56 his or her customary occupation; and the distance of the 57 available work from his or her residence. 58 (b)âNotwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, 59 work is not deemed suitable and benefits may not be denied to 60 any otherwise eligible individual for refusing to accept new 61 work under any of the following conditions: 62 1.âThe position offered is vacant due directly to a strike, 63 lockout, or other labor dispute. 64 2.âThe wages, hours, or other conditions of the work 65 offered are substantially less favorable to the individual than 66 those prevailing for similar work in the locality. 67 3.âAs a condition of being employed, the individual is 68 required to join a company union or to resign from or refrain 69 from joining any bona fide labor organization. 70 (c)âIf the department finds that an individual was rejected 71 for offered employment as the direct result of a positive, 72 confirmed drug test required as a condition of employment, the 73 individual is disqualified for refusing to accept an offer of 74 suitable work. 75 Section 3.âSection 443.1112, Florida Statutes, is created 76 to read: 77 443.1112âVerification of reemployment assistance benefit 78 eligibility; detection of fraud.â 79 (1)âThe Department of Commerce shall verify the identity of 80 each claimant who applies for reemployment assistance benefits 81 before paying any benefits to that individual. 82 (2)âFor the initial claim for benefits made by a claimant 83 and as necessary to verify a claimantâs eligibility for 84 benefits, the department shall cross-check the information 85 contained in the claim with information in the database of the 86 Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program 87 established by the United States Bureau of Citizenship and 88 Immigration Services. 89 (3)âFor every 2 weeks that a claimant makes a claim for 90 benefits, including the initial claim for benefits, to verify a 91 claimantâs eligibility for benefits, the department shall cross 92 check the information contained in the claim to make sure that 93 the claimant is: 94 (a)âLiving. 95 (b)âNot incarcerated. 96 (c)âNot already employed. 97 (4)âThe department shall do all of the following: 98 (a)âInvestigate any claim in this state associated with a 99 mailing address, a bank account, an e-mail address, a telephone 100 number, or an Internet protocol address that is also associated 101 with another existing claim for reemployment assistance benefits 102 in this state or another state and verify that the claim in this 103 state is legitimate and not fraudulent before paying any 104 benefits for the claim. 105 (b)âScrutinize any claim in this state filed from a foreign 106 Internet protocol address before paying any benefits for the 107 claim. 108 (c)âWork with the United States Department of Labor, the 109 United States Department of Justice, other state workforce 110 agencies, the Department of Law Enforcement, the state 111 attorneys, or the Office of the Statewide Prosecutor to share 112 information related to fraudulent claims or attempted fraudulent 113 claims to the extent feasible for further investigation and 114 proceedings brought under this chapter. 115 (d)âMaintain a web page through which an individual or an 116 employer may report known or suspected violations of this 117 chapter, including identity theft or fraud. Each year, the 118 department shall notify employers in this state of this web page 119 for reporting violations. 120 (e)âEach year, make available on its website a report 121 identifying the number of fraudulent reemployment assistance 122 claims identified for the previous year, the number of claims 123 not paid due to successful detection of fraudulent intentions, 124 the number of claims and the amount of reemployment assistance 125 benefits paid against claims subsequently identified as 126 fraudulent, the amount of fraudulent overpayments recovered, and 127 the number of fraudulent claims referred for investigation and 128 possible prosecution. The report must also list the sources of 129 information which were used to cross-check claims during the 130 reporting period. 131 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.